Utah statutes.
61-2a-4.   Additional license fee -- Purpose.
(1)  A person who applies for or renews a real estate principal broker or
associate broker license shall pay, in addition to the application or renewal
fee, a reasonable annual fee of up to $18, as determined by the division with
the concurrence of the commission.
(2)  A person who applies for or renews a real estate sales agent license
shall pay in addition to the application or renewal fee a reasonable annual
fee of up to $12, as determined by the division with the concurrence of the
commission.
(3)  Notwithstanding Section 13-1-2, the additional fees under this section
shall be paid into the fund to be used for the purposes of this chapter.
